Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 11.71.300.
Penalties under other laws.

A penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is in addition to, and not in place of, any other civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Bar to prosecution — AS

11.71.310

Original Code Provision — None.

See AS

11.81.210

, applicability of provisions generally under this title, on civil penalties or civil remedies that are available outside of this title.

Sec. 11.71.305.
Rehabilitation.

A person convicted of violating a provision of this chapter may, when the violation relates to that person’s own personal use of a controlled substance, be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for rehabilitative treatment for not to exceed one year.
Such treatment may be imposed in place of a fine or imprisonment, but only where the imprisonment would not have exceeded one year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, § 2 (1984))

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

For provisions related to the Uniform Alcoholism and Intoxication Treatment Act, see AS 47.37.

Sec. 11.71.310.
Bar to prosecution. [Repealed, § 40 ch 75 SLA 2008.]

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(a), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 repeal of this section “[applies] to an offense occurring on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that § 40, ch. 75, SLA 2008, repealing this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 11.71.311.
Restriction on prosecution for certain persons in connection with a drug overdose.

A person may not be prosecuted for a violation of AS

11.71.040(a)(3)

, (4), or (12),

11.71.050(a)(4)

or (5), or

11.71.060(a)(1)

or (2) if that person

sought, in good faith, medical or law enforcement assistance for another person who the person reasonably believed was experiencing a drug overdose and

the evidence supporting the prosecution for an offense under AS

11.71.040(a)(3)

, (4), or (12),

11.71.050(a)(4)

or (5), or

11.71.060(a)(1)

or (2) was obtained or discovered as a result of the person seeking medical or law enforcement assistance;

the person remained at the scene with the other person until medical or law enforcement assistance arrived; and

the person cooperated with medical or law enforcement personnel, including by providing identification;

was experiencing a drug overdose and sought medical assistance, and the evidence supporting a prosecution for an offense under AS 11.71.040(a)(3), (4), or (12), 11.71.050(a)(4) or (5), or 11.71.060(a)(1) or (2) was obtained as a result of the overdose and the need for medical assistance.

In this section, “drug overdose” means a controlled-substance-induced physiological event that results in a life-threatening emergency to the person who ingested, inhaled, injected, or otherwise introduced the controlled substance into the body.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 2014; am § 49 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 55 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(30), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), (a)(1)(A) and (a)(2), substituted “11.71.050(a)(4)” for “11.71.050(a)(2)”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), substituted “AS

11.71.040(a)(3)

, (4), or (12),

11.71.050(a)(4)

or (5), or

11.71.060(a)(1)

or (2)” for “AS

11.71.030(a)(3)

,

11.71.040(a)(3)

or (4),

11.71.050(a)(4)

, or

11.71.060(a)(1)

or (2)” in the introductory paragraph, (a)(1)(A), and (a)(2).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 72, SLA 2014, this section applies to offenses occurring on or after October 8, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.320.
Excluded defenses.

In a prosecution for the possession of a schedule IA, IIA, IIIA, IVA, or VA controlled substance under this chapter, it is not a defense that the substance was possessed in less than a usable quantity. It is sufficient to support a conviction that there is a sufficient quantity of the substance to permit proper identification.

In a prosecution for an offense involving a controlled substance under this chapter, it is not a defense that the substance is misclassified under a subsection within a schedule.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Schedule IA through VA controlled substances — AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.180

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.71.330.
Liability of public servants.

No liability is imposed by this chapter upon a public servant acting within the scope and authority of the public servant’s employment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Justification: performance of public duty — AS

11.81.420

Original Code Provision — AS 17.12.080.

Sec. 11.71.340.
Offenses defined by amounts.

Whenever a provision of this chapter defining an offense requires a determination of an amount, it is not a defense to the lowest class of offense established by the evidence that the amount in question was equal to or larger than the amount which would make the offense a higher class of offense, and a person may be charged and convicted accordingly.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Offenses defined by age or value — AS

11.81.615

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.71.350.
Burden of proof.

It is not necessary for the state to negate an exemption or exception provided for in this chapter in a complaint, information, indictment, or other pleading or at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this chapter or AS 17.30. The defendant has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence any exemption or exception claimed by the defendant.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — AS 17.12.100.

Sec. 11.71.360.
Unprivileged communications.

Information communicated to a physician or other licensed practitioner in an effort to unlawfully procure a controlled substance or to unlawfully procure the administration of a controlled substance is not a privileged communication.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “controlled substance” — AS

11.71.900

Original Code Provision — AS 17.10.170(b).